Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4909
Company, defined.

Company means any person subject to the sales and use taxes and either the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or the franchise tax under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807, any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or joint venture that is or would otherwise be a member of the same unitary group, if incorporated, which is, or whose partners, members, or owners are, subject to such taxes, and any other partnership, limited liability company, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture when the partners, owners, shareholders, or members are subject to such taxes.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 264, § 4.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.